Washington statutes.
RCW 33.04.004

Short title.

This title may be known and cited as the Washington savings association act.

[ 2014 c 37 s 601.]

NOTES:

Legislative declarations—Effective date—2014 c 37: See RCW 30A.04.005 and 30A.04.902.